lexc/misc/enhuneg.lexc
!!!enhuneg.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Neg
      
LEXICON Root
Neg;


LEXICON Neg
ne AddNeg;
nem AddNeg;
se AddNeg;
sem AddNeg;
soha AddNeg;
sohase AddNeg;
sohasem AddNeg;
sohse AddNeg;
sose AddNeg;
sosem AddNeg;
sosincs AddNeg;

LEXICON AddNeg
[stem]+Neg:0     #;
